Utah statutes.
23-21a-2.   Legislative findings and policy.
The legislature of the state of Utah recognizes that the number of breeding
sites of the American white pelican has been reduced from in excess of 50
prior to 1932 to only seven major sites in 1976 as a result of the removal of
water barriers around breeding sites, loss of food supply, and human
disturbance of nesting colonies. The legislature of the state of Utah further
recognizes that Gunnison Island in the Great Salt Lake, one of the seven
remaining pelican rookeries in North America, produces over 20% of the world's
population of the American white pelican, and is the only remaining major
pelican rookery that does not have refuge status. It is hereby declared to be
the policy of the state of Utah that areas that will support certain
threatened life forms shall be preserved for their benefit and for the benefit
and enjoyment of present and future generations of people.
